apertium-pl-uk.uk.dix
    <pardef n="виш/ня__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ні</l>
          <r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ні</l>
          <r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ню</l>
          <r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ні</l>
          <r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>не</l>
          <r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>нею</l>
          <r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ня</l>
          <r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ень</l>
          <r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ням</l>
          <r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ні</l>
          <r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>нях</l>
          <r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ні</l>
          <r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>нями</l>
          <r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ні</l>
          <r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="наді/я__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ї</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ї</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ю</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ї</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>є</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>єю</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>я</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>й</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ям</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ї</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ях</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ї</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ями</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ї</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="груш/а__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>і</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>і</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>у</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>і</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ею</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>і</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ах</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>і</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ами</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>і</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="абажур__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ові</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>у</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ом</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>і</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ів</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ами</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ах</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="абажур"><i>абажур</i><par n="абажур__n"/></e>
    <e lm="абонемент"><i>абонемент</i><par n="абажур__n"/></e>
    <e lm="абрикос"><i>абрикос</i><par n="абажур__n"/></e>
    <e lm="вишня"><i>виш</i><par n="виш/ня__n"/></e>
    <e lm="груша"><i>груш</i><par n="груш/а__n"/></e>
    <e lm="делегація"><i>делегаці</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="корпорація"><i>корпораці</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="цивілізація"><i>цивілізаці</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="армія"><i>армі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="демократія"><i>демократі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="інформація"><i>інформаці</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="конференція"><i>конференці</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="мрія"><i>мрі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="позиція"><i>позиці</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="продукція"><i>продукці</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="вія"><i>ві</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="технологія"><i>технологі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="фотографія"><i>фотографі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="абазія"><i>абазі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="абсолюція"><i>абсолюці</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="автоматизація"><i>автоматизаці</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="автофілія"><i>автофілі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="аглютинація"><i>аглютинаці</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="агробіологія"><i>агробіологі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ад'єктивація"><i>ад'єктиваці</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="адресація"><i>адресаці</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="акваторія"><i>акваторі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="аксонометрія"><i>аксонометрі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="акумуляція"><i>акумуляці</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="алегорія"><i>алегорі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="алокуція"><i>алокуці</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="альгологія"><i>альгологі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="алюмінографія"><i>алюмінографі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="амоніфікація"><i>амоніфікаці</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="амімія"><i>амімі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="анатомія"><i>анатомі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="андрологія"><i>андрологі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="анергія"><i>анергі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="антиномія"><i>антиномі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="антропонімія"><i>антропонімі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="анізокорія"><i>анізокорі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="аплазія"><i>аплазі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="аппозиція"><i>аппозиці</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="аргентометрія"><i>аргентометрі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="артерія"><i>артері</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="археологія"><i>археологі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="асоноризація"><i>асоноризаці</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="астрогеологія"><i>астрогеологі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="астрономія"><i>астрономі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="атаксія"><i>атаксі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="атрибуція"><i>атрибуці</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ахондроплазія"><i>ахондроплазі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="бактеріоскопія"><i>бактеріоскопі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="бегонія"><i>бегоні</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="брадителія"><i>брадителі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="бутафорія"><i>бутафорі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="біжутерія"><i>біжутері</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="біономія"><i>біономі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="вакцинація"><i>вакцинаці</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="векторкардіографія"><i>векторкардіографі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ветеринарія"><i>ветеринарі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="візитація"><i>візитаці</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="вітрифікація"><i>вітрифікаці</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="гамма-астрономія"><i>гамма-астрономі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="гармонія"><i>гармоні</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="гвардія"><i>гварді</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="геліофобія"><i>геліофобі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="геморагія"><i>геморагі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="генеалогія"><i>генеалогі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="геометрія"><i>геометрі</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="герметизація"><i>герметизаці</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="гетерогонія"><i>гетерогоні</i><par n="наді/я__n"/></e>
